Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 43.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-807
Power of attorney; powers relating
to rights of survivorship and beneficiary designations.

An agent or attorney in fact under a power
of attorney, whether the power of attorney is durable or nondurable, may do
the following on behalf of the principal or with the principal's property
only if the power of attorney expressly grants the agent or attorney in fact
the authority and exercise of the authority is not otherwise prohibited by
another agreement or instrument to which the authority or property is subject:

(1) Create
or change rights of survivorship; or

(2) Create or change a beneficiary designation.

Laws 2010, LB712, § 43.